pt-BR: Aplicativo de IA: Sistema autônomo; Visão computacional; Detecção de fraude; Processamento de linguagem natural (PNL); Análise preditiva; Sistema de recomendação; Reconhecimento de voz; Outro
tr: Yapay zeka uygulaması: Otonom sistem; Bilgisayar görüşü; Sahtekarlık tespiti; Doğal dil işleme (NLP); Tahmine dayalı analiz; Öneri sistemi; Konuşma tanıma; Diğer
es: Aplicación de IA: Sistema autónomo; Visión por computadora; Detección de fraude; Procesamiento del lenguaje natural (PLN); Análisis predictivo; Sistema de recomendación; Reconocimiento de voz; Otros
zh-CN: AI 应用程序: 自主系统; 计算机视觉; 欺诈检测; 自然语言处理 (NLP); 预测分析; 建议系统; 语音识别; 其他
en: AI application: Autonomous system; Computer vision; Fraud detection; Natural language processing (NLP); Predictive analytics; Recommendation system; Speech recognition; Other
fi: Tekoälysovellus: Autonominen järjestelmä; Konenäkö; Petosten havaitseminen; Luonnollisen kielen käsittely (NLP); Ennakoiva analytiikka; Suositusjärjestelmä; Äänentunnistus; Muu
zh-TW: 人工智慧應用: 自治系統; 電腦視覺; 詐欺偵測; 自然語言處理 (NLP); 預測分析; 推薦系統; 語音辨識; 其他
da: AI-anvendelse: Autonomt system; Computervision; Opdagelse af svindel; Naturlig sprogbehandling (NLP); Forudsigende analyse; Anbefalingssystem; Talegenkendelse; Andet
pl: Zastosowanie AI: System autonomiczny; Wizja komputerowa; Wykrywanie oszustw; Przetwarzanie języka naturalnego (NLP); Analityka predykcyjna; System rekomendacji; Rozpoznawanie mowy; Inne
ro-RO: Aplicație bazată pe IA: Sistem autonom; Viziune computerizată; Detectarea fraudelor; Procesarea limbajului natural (NLP); Analiză predictivă; Sistem de recomandări; Recunoașterea vorbirii; Altele
nb: AI-applikasjon: Autonomt system; Datamaskinsyn; Svindeldeteksjon; Naturlig språkbehandling (NLP); Prediktiv analyse; Anbefalingssystem; Talegjenkjenning; Annet
ja: AIの用途: 自律システム; コンピュータービジョン; 不正検知; 自然言語処理 (NLP); 予測分析; 推薦システム; 言語認識; その他
de: KI-Anwendung: Autonomes System; Computer Vision; Betrugserkennung; Linguistische Datenverarbeitung (LDV); Prognoseanalysen; Empfehlungssystem; Spracherkennung; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Aplikacija UI: Avtonomni sistem; Računalniški vid; Odkrivanje goljufij; Obdelava naravnega jezika (NLP); Napovedna analitika; Sistem priporočil; Prepoznavanje govora; Drugo
ru: Возможности на базе ИИ: Автономная система; Машинное зрение; Обнаружение мошенничества; Обработка естественного языка (NLP); Прогностический анализ; Система рекомендаций; Распознавание речи; Другое
vi: Ứng dụng trí tuệ nhân tạo: Hệ thống tự trị; Tầm nhìn máy tính; Phát hiện gian lận; Xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP); Phân tích dự đoán; Hệ thống khuyến nghị; Nhận dạng giọng nói; Khác
it: Applicazione dell’IA: Sistema autonomo; Visione computerizzata; Rilevamento delle frodi; Elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP); Analisi predittiva; Sistema di raccomandazioni; Riconoscimento vocale; Altro
el: Εφαρμογή AI: Αυτόνομο σύστημα; Οπτική επεξεργασία; Ανίχνευση απάτης; Επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας (NLP); Προγνωστικές αναλύσεις; Σύστημα συστάσεων; Αναγνώριση ομιλίας; Άλλο
hr-HR: Primjena umjetne inteligencije: Autonomni sustav; Računalni vid; Otkrivanje prijevara; Obrada prirodnog jezika (NLP); Prediktivna analitika; Sustav preporuka; Prepoznavanje govora; Ostalo
hu: Az MI használata: Autonóm rendszer; Számítógépes megjelenítés; Csalásészlelés; Természetes nyelvfeldolgozás; Prediktív elemzés; Ajánlási rendszer; Beszédfelismerés; Egyéb
fr: Application d’IA: Système autonome; Vision par ordinateur; Détection de fraude; Traitement automatique des langues (NLP); Analyses prédictives; Système de recommandation; Reconnaissance vocale; Autre
pt-PT: Aplicação de IA: Sistema autónomo; Visão computacional; Deteção de fraude; Processamento de linguagem natural (NLP); Análise preditiva; Sistema de recomendação; Reconhecimento de voz; Outro
nl: AI-toepassing: Autonoom systeem; Computervisie; Fraudedetectie; Natuurlijke taalverwerking (NTV); Voorspellende analytics; Aanbevelingssysteem; Spraakherkenning; Andere
cs: Aplikace AI: Autonomní systém; Počítačové vidění; Odhalování podvodů; Zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP); Prediktivní analytika; Systém doporučování; Rozpoznávání hlasu; Jiné
ko: AI 적용: 자율 시스템; 컴퓨터 비전; 사기 감지; 자연어 처리(NLP); 예측 분석; 추천 시스템; 음성 인식; 기타
bg-BG: Приложение с AI: Автономна система; Компютърна визия; Откриване на измами; Обработка на естествен език (NLP); Прогностичен анализ; Система за препоръки; Разпознаване на реч; Други
lt-LT: DI taikymas: Autonominė sistema; Kompiuterinė rega; Sukčiavimo aptikimas; Natūralios kalbos apdorojimas (NLP); Predikcinė analizė; Rekomendacijų sistema; Kalbos atpažinimas; Kita
sv: AI-applikation: Fristående system; Datorseende; Antibedrägerifunktioner; Naturlig språkbehandling (NLP); Prediktiv analys; Rekommendationssystem; Taligenkänning; Övrigt
sk-SK: Aplikácia AI: Autonómny systém; Počítačové videnie; Odhaľovanie podvodov; Spracovanie prirodzeného jazyka (NLP); Prediktívna analytika; Systém odporúčaní; Rozpoznávanie reči; Iné
th: แอปพลิเคชัน AI: ระบบอัตโนมัติ; คอมพิวเตอร์วิทัศน์; ตรวจจับการทุจริต; การประมวลผลภาษาธรรมชาติ (NLP); การวิเคราะห์ข้อมูลแบบคาดการณ์; ระบบให้คำแนะนำ; เทคโนโลยีรู้จำเสียงพูด; อื่นๆ